Hawaii statutes.
§373-14 Revocation, suspension, and fines.
In addition to any other actions authorized by law, after affording all
interested parties reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing, the director may
revoke or suspend any license, or impose a fine not to exceed $1,000 per
violation, for cause. In addition to any other grounds for disciplinary action
authorized by law, "cause" means violation of this chapter or a rule
of the director. [L 1959, c 264, pt of §3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; Supp,
§88A-14; HRS §373-14; am L 1980, c 302, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 202, §3; am L
2002, c 22, §10]

Cross References

Hearings, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next